src/fastspell_dictionaries/ti_ER.dic
ኣስመራ/AB
ይጽሕፍ/ACD
ይጽሕፉ/AC
ይጽሕፋ/AC
ይጽሕፎ/AC
ይጽሕፈሉ/ABCD
ይጽሕፍሉ/ABC
ዝሃስስ/AC
ዝሃስዩ/AC
ዝሃበ/AG
ዝሃበት/AG
ዝሃባ/AC
ዝሃቦ/AG
ዝሃንጹ/AC
ዝሃንጽ/AC
ዝሃደሙ/AG
ዝሃድሙ/AC
ዝሃድም/AC
ዝህሉ/AC
ዝህልወና/AC
ዝህልወካ/AC
ዝህልዉ/AC
ዝህልዋ/AC
ዝህልው/AC
ዝህልዎ/AC
ዝህልዎም/AC
ዝህረም/AC
ዝህበሉ/AC
ዝህበና/AC
ዝህበካ/AC
ዝህቡ/AC
ዝህባ/AC
ዝህብ/AC
ዝህብዎ/AC
ዝህቦ/AC
ዝህቦም/AC
ዝህነጽ/AC
ዝህውትት/AC
ዝለምዕ/AC
ዝለቅቕ/AC
ዝለኣኽ/AC
ዝለዋወጥ/AC
ዝለዓል/AC
ዝልለ/AC
ዝልምኑ/AC
ዝልእኽ/AC
ዝልወጥ/AC
ዝልውጥ/AC
ዝልግስ/AC
ዝሓለፈ/AC
ዝሓለፉ/AC
ዝሓልዩ/AC
ዝሓልፋ/AC
ዝሓልፍ/AC
ዝሓልፎ/AC
ዝሓሙ/AC
ዝሓምም/AC
ዝሓስበሉ/AC
ዝሓስቡ/AC
ዝሓስብ/AC
ዝሓስቦ/AC
ዝሓብእ/AC
ዝሓተተ/AC
ዝሓተቱ/AC
ዝሓቱ/AC
ዝሓታ/AC
ዝሓትት/AC
ዝሓቶ/AC
ዝሓቶም/AC
ዝሓወየ/AC
ዝሓዊ/AC
ዝሓዘ/AC
ዝሓዙ/AC
ዝሓየለ/AC
ዝሓድሩ/AC
ዝሓድር/AC
ዝሓጽር/AC
ዝሓፍስ/AC
ዝሕለፍ/AC
ዝሕሉ/AC
ዝሕልዋ/AC
ዝሕልው/AC
ዝሕሎ/AC
ዝሕመስ/AC
ዝሕረስ/AC
ዝሕረድ/AC
ዝሕሰብ/AC
ዝሕሱ/AC
ዝሕበር/AC
ዝሕብሩ/AC
ዝሕብር/AC
ዝሕብሮ/AC
ዝሕብሮም/AC
ዝሕተተሉ/AC
ዝሕተቱ/AC
ዝሕተት/AC
ዝሕንብስ/AC
ዝሕንጽጽ/AC
ዝሕከም/AC
ዝሕከኽ/AC
ዝሕዙ/AC
ዝሕዛ/AC
ዝሕዝ/AC
ዝሕዝዎ/AC
ዝሕዞ/AC
ዝሕዞም/AC
ዝሕይል/AC
ዝሕደስ/AC
ዝሕግዘኒ/AC
ዝሕግዘና/AC
ዝሕግዙ/AC
ዝሕግዛ/AC
ዝሕግዝ/AC
ዝሕግዞም/AC
ዝሕጎሰሉ/AC
ዝሕጸ/AC
ዝሕጸብ/AC
ዝመሃሩ/AC
ዝመሃር/AC
ዝመሃሮ/ACE
ዝመለሰ/ACE
ዝመላለስ/ACE
ዝመልስ/AC
ዝመልሶ/ACE
ዝመልኣ/ACE
ዝመልእ/AC
ዝመልኦ/AC
ዝመልኮ/AC
ዝመሓደር/AC
ዝመረጸ/AC
ዝመራመር/AC
ዝመርሑ/ACE
ዝመርሓ/ACE
ዝመርሕ/AC
ዝመርሖ/AC
ዝመርጹ/ACE
ዝመርጽ/AC
ዝመሳሰል/AC
ዝመስለኒ/AC
ዝመስለና/AC
ዝመስሉ/AC
ዝመስል/AC
ዝመስሎም/AC
ዝመክር/AC
ዝመውት/AC
ዝመዓራረ/AC
ዝመዝን/AC
ዝመዝኖ/AC
ዝመጸ/AC
ዝመጸት/AC
ዝመጸና/AC
ዝመጹ/AC
ዝመጺ/AC
ዝመጻ/AC
ዝመጽአ/AC
ዝመጽእ/AC
ዝመጾ/AC
ዝማሃር/AC
ዝማላእ/AC
ዝማዕበለ/AC
ዝማዕበላ/AC
ዝማጎት/AC
ዝምሃር/AC
ዝምህሩ/AC
ዝምህር/AC
ዝምህሮ/AC
ዝምለሱ/AC
ዝምለስ/AC
ዝምለሶ/AC
ዝምለኽ/AC
ዝምላእ/AC
ዝምልሰሉ/AC
ዝምልስ/AC
ዝምልከት/AC
ዝምልከቶ/AC
ዝምልከቶም/AC
ዝምሕር/AC
ዝምረጽ/AC
ዝምራሕ/AC
ዝምርመር/AC
ዝምርምር/AC
ዝምርምሮ/AC
ዝምርሽ/AC
ዝምርኰስ/AC
ዝምርዖ/AC
ዝምስል/AC
ዝምስረት/AC
ዝምስርት/AC
ዝምስክር/AC
ዝምነ/AC
ዝምነዮ/AC
ዝምኖ/AC
ዝምእዘዝ/AC
ዝምክት/AC
ዝምዕብል/AC
ዝምዘን/AC
ዝምዝገብ/AC
ዝምድር/AC
ዝምጉት/AC
ዝምግብ/AC
ዝሞተ/AC
ዝሞቱ/AC
ዝሞታ/AC
ዝረብሑ/AC
ዝረብሕ/AC
ዝረአ/AC
ዝረኣየ/AC
ዝረኣየካ/AC
ዝረኣዩ/AC
ዝረኣዩኻ/AC
ዝረኣያ/AC
ዝረኣዮ/AC
ዝረክብ/AC
ዝረኸበ/AC
ዝረኸበት/AC
ዝረኸቡ/AC
ዝረኸባ/AC
ዝረኸብናዮ/AC
ዝረኸብዎ/AC
ዝረኸቦ/AC
ዝረኽበን/AC
ዝረኽበሉ/AC
ዝረኽበሎም/AC
ዝረኽባ/AC
ዝረኽብሉ/AC
ዝረኽብዎ/AC
ዝረኽቦም/AC
ዝረዳዳእ/AC
ዝረግጽ/AC
ዝረግጾ/AC
ዝሪኦ/AC
ዝራኣዩ/AC
ዝራኸቡ/AC
ዝራኸብ/AC
ዝርሕቕ/AC
ዝርሳዕ/AC
ዝርስዕ/AC
ዝርስዖ/AC
ዝርአ/AC
ዝርኢ/AC
ዝርኣዩ/AC
ዝርኣዮ/AC
ዝርኤ/AC
ዝርእየ/AC
ዝርእዩ/AC
ዝርእያ/AC
ዝርእይ/AC
ዝርእይዎ/AC
ዝርእዮ/AC
ዝርእዮም/AC
ዝርከበሉ/AC
ዝርከቡ/AC
ዝርከባ/AC
ዝርከብ/AC
ዝርከቦ/AC
ዝርከቦም/AC
ዝርዳእ/AC
ዝርድኡ/AC
ዝርድእዎ/AC
ዝርድኦ/AC
ዝርጋሕ/AC
ዝሮም/AC
ዝሰማማዕ/AC
ዝሰምዐ/AC
ዝሰምዑ/AC
ዝሰምዓ/AC
ዝሰምዓካ/AC
ዝሰምዕ/AC
ዝሰምዕዎ/AC
ዝሰምዖ/AC
ዝሰምዖም/AC
ዝሰርሐ/AC
ዝሰርሑ/AC
ዝሰርሓ/AC
ዝሰርሓሉ/AC
ዝሰርሕ/AC
ዝሰርሖ/AC
ዝሰርቕ/AC
ዝሰርዓ/AC
ዝሰርዕ/AC
ዝሰብኽ/AC
ዝሰቲ/AC
ዝሰትዩ/AC
ዝሰኣኑ/AC
ዝሰዓር/AC
ዝሰድድ/AC
ዝሰዶ/AC
ዝሰጋገር/AC
ዝሰግር/AC
ዝሰፍሕ/AC
ዝሳቐ/AC
ዝሳቐዩ/AC
ዝሳተፉ/AC
ዝሳተፋ/AC
ዝሳተፍ/AC
ዝሳተፎ/AC
ዝሳነ/AC
ዝስለፍ/AC
ዝስሕቕ/AC
ዝስሕብ/AC
ዝስሕት/AC
ዝስሕቶ/AC
ዝስማዕ/AC
ዝስምዓ/AC
ዝስምዓና/AC
ዝስምዖ/AC
ዝስምዖም/AC
ዝስራ/AC
ዝስራሓሉ/AC
ዝስራሕ/AC
ዝስራዕ/AC
ዝስርሑ/AC
ዝስርሓሉ/AC
ዝስርሕ/AC
ዝስበር/AC
ዝስተ/AC
ዝስነ/AC
ዝስእ/AC
ዝስእሉ/AC
ዝስእል/AC
ዝስእኑ/AC
ዝስከም/AC
ዝስከፍ/AC
ዝስዕር/AC
ዝስዕስዕ/AC
ዝስዕብ/AC
ዝስዕቦ/AC
ዝስደዱ/AC
ዝስደድ/AC
ዝስገር/AC
ዝስጉም/AC
ዝሸይጥ/AC
ዝሸጡ/AC
ዝሸጦ/AC
ዝሻቐል/AC
ዝሽየጥ/AC
ዝሽገር/AC
ዝቀረበ/AC
ዝቀራረብ/AC
ዝቀርቡ/AC
ዝቀርብ/AC
ዝቃለሰሉ/AC
ዝቃለሱ/AC
ዝቃለስ/AC
ዝቃለሶ/AC
ዝቃላዕ/AC
ዝቃወም/AC
ዝቃወሞ/AC
ዝቃዶ/AC
ዝቅበሉ/AC
ዝቅበል/AC
ዝቅበሎ/AC
ዝቅየር/AC
ዝቅይር/AC
ዝቅጽል/AC
ዝቆጻጸር/AC
ዝቆጻጸሮ/AC
ዝቋጻጸር/AC
ዝቋጻጸሮ/AC
ዝቐረበ/AC
ዝቐርቡ/AC
ዝቐርብ/AC
ዝቐትል/AC
ዝቐውም/AC
ዝቕመጡ/AC
ዝቕበሉ/AC
ዝቕበል/AC
ዝቕበሎ/AC
ዝቕበር/AC
ዝቕተል/AC
ዝቕየር/AC
ዝቕየድ/AC
ዝቕይር/AC
ዝቕጻዕ/AC
ዝቕጽሉ/AC
ዝቕጽል/AC
ዝቕጽሎ/AC
ዝቖርጽ/AC
ዝበሃል/AC
ዝበለ/AC
ዝበለት/AC
ዝበለቶ/AG
ዝበሉ/AC
ዝበል/AC
ዝበልካ/AC
ዝበልካዮ/AG
ዝበልዎ/AC
ዝበልዑ/AC
ዝበልዓ/AC
ዝበልዕ/AC
ዝበልዕዎ/AC
ዝበልዖ/AC
ዝበሎ/AC
ዝበሎም/AC
ዝበራበር/AC
ዝበርህ/AC
ዝበርቕ/AC
ዝበቕዓ/AC
ዝበኽዩ/AC
ዝበዝሑ/AC
ዝበዝሓ/AC
ዝበዝሕ/AC
ዝበዝሖ/AC
ዝበጽሐ/AG
ዝበጽሑ/AC
ዝበጽሕ/AC
ዝበጽሖም/AC
ዝብለን/AC
ዝብለል/AC
ዝብለና/AC
ዝብለካ/AC
ዝብሉና/AC
ዝብላ/AC
ዝብል/AC
ዝብሎ/AC
ዝብድህ/AC
ዝብገስ/AC
ዝተሃንጸ/AG
ዝተላዕለ/AG
ዝተሓበረ/AG
ዝተሓባበሩ/AC
ዝተሓባበር/AC
ዝተሓዝ/AG
ዝተሓጋገዝ/AC
ዝመልሱ/ACE
ዝተመርጸ/AG
ዝተመዝገበ/AG
ዝተማህረ/AG
ዝተረኽበ/AG
ዝረኽቡ/ACE
ዝረኽቦ/ACE
ዝረድኦ/AC
ዝተረድኦ/AG
ዝተረጋገጸ/AG
ዝተራእየ/AG
ዝተራእዩ/AG
ዝተርፍ/AC
ዝተሰምዐ/AG
ዝተሰርሐ/AG
ዝተሳተፈ/AG
ዝሳተፉ/ACE
ዝቐትሉ/ACE
ዝተቓለሱ/AG
ዝተባህለ/AG
ዝተባህሉ/AG
ዝተታሕዘ/AG
ዝተነግረ/AG
ዝተኣማመን/AC
ዝተኣስሩ/AG
ዝተኣታቶ/AC
ዝተክል/AC
ዝተኸለ/AG
ዝተኸስተ/AG
ዝተኻእለ/AG
ዝተኻየደ/AG
ዝተኽሉ/AC
ዝተወልደ/AG
ዝተወሰነ/AG
ዝተዋህበ/AG
ዝተዋህቦ/AG
ዝተዋህቦም/AG
ዝተዓወቱ/AG
ዝተዓደለ/AG
ዝተዛዘመ/AG
ዝተደልየ/AG
ዝተዳለወ/AG
ዝተጀመረ/AG
ዝተገብረ/AG
ዝገብረሉ/AGEF
ዝተፈልየ/AG
ዝተፈልጠ/AG
ዝተፈልጡ/AG
ዝተፈቕደሎም/AG
ዝነቅሕ/AC
ዝነቐጸ/AG
ዝነበረ/AG
ዝነበረት/AG
ዝነበሩ/AG
ዝነበራ/AG
ዝነበር/AC
ዝነበርና/AG
ዝነበርካ/AG
ዝነበሮ/AG
ዝነበሮም/AG
ዝነብረ/AC
ዝነብረሉ/AC
ዝነብረላ/AC
ዝነብሩ/AC
ዝነብራ/AC
ዝነብር/AC
ዝነብርሉ/AC
ዝነብሮ/AC
ዝነብዕ/AC
ዝነውሕ/AC
ዝነግረና/AC
ዝነግሩ/AC
ዝነግር/AC
ዝነግሮ/AC
ዝነጥፉ/AC
ዝነጥፍ/AC
ዝንቀሳቐሱ/AC
ዝንቀሳቐስ/AC
ዝንበር/AC
ዝንገር/AC
ዝንጸል/AC
ዝኣልዩ/AC
ዝኣልዮም/AC
ዝኣመነ/AC
ዝኣምነሉ/AC
ዝኣምኑ/AC
ዝኣምንሉ/AC
ዝኣምኖ/AC
ዝኣምኖም/AC
ዝኣስር/AC
ዝኣተወ/AG
ዝኣተዉ/AG
ዝኣቱ/AC
ዝኣትወሉ/AC
ዝኣትዉ/AC
ዝኣትዋ/AC
ዝኣትዎ/AC
ዝኣኸለ/AG
ዝእለዩ/AC
ዝእርም/AC
ዝእሰር/AC
ዝእከብ/AC
ዝእውጅ/AC
ዝከላኸለሉ/AC
ዝከላኸል/AC
ዝከታተሉ/AC
ዝከታተሎ/AC
ዝከኣሉ/AC
ዝከፋፈል/AC
ዝካየዱ/AC
ዝኮነት/AG
ዝኮኑ/AC
ዝኰነ/AG
ዝኸይድ/AC
ዝኸደ/AG
ዝኸዱ/AC
ዝኸፍሉ/AC
ዝኸፍት/AC
ዝኽሕድ/AC
ዝኽበር/AC
ዝኽተል/AC
ዝኽተሎ/AC
ዝኽእሉ/AC
ዝኽእላ/AC
ዝኽእል/AC
ዝኽውን/AC
ዝኾነ/AG
ዝኾነት/AG
ዝኾኑ/AC
ዝኾና/AC
ዝዀነ/AG
ዝዀኑ/AC
ዝወሃብ/AC
ዝወሃቦም/AC
ዝወልዳ/AC
ዝወረደ/AG
ዝወረዳ/AC
ዝወርድ/AC
ዝወሰነት/AG
ዝወሰደ/AG
ዝወስደሉ/AC
ዝወስዱ/AC
ዝወስዳ/AC
ዝወስድ/AC
ዝወስዶ/AC
ዝወስዶም/AC
ዝወቅዕ/AC
ዝወነነ/AG
ዝወዓለ/AG
ዝወዓሉ/AC
ዝወዳደር/AC
ዝወድቕ/AC
ዝወግሕ/AC
ዝወጸ/AC
ዝወጸሉ/AC
ዝወጹ/AC
ዝወጻሉ/AC
ዝወጽእ/AC
ዝወጾ/AC
ዝወፍር/AC
ዝዋሃቦ/AC
ዝዋረድ/AC
ዝዋሳእ/AC
ዝዋጋእ/AC
ዝውሃብ/AC
ዝውለዱ/AC
ዝውለድ/AC
ዝውሰድ/AC
ዝውስን/AC
ዝውስኽ/AC
ዝውንን/AC
ዝውንኑ/AC
ዝውንና/AC
ዝውንኖ/AC
ዝውክል/AC
ዝውዕሉ/AC
ዝውዕል/AC
ዝውዕሎ/AC
ዝውደብ/AC
ዝውዳእ/AC
ዝውድስ/AC
ዝውድብ/AC
ዝውድእ/AC
ዝውጻእ/AC
ዝዓልብ/AC
ዝዓምም/AC
ዝዓርብ/AC
ዝዓርፍ/AC
ዝዓበየ/AG
ዝዓበዩ/AG
ዝዓቢ/AC
ዝዓብዩ/AC
ዝዓነወ/AC
ዝዓዝዝ/AC
ዝዓዩ/AC
ዝዓዪ/AC
ዝዓግት/AC
ዝዕረ/AC
ዝዕቀብ/AC
ዝዕቅብ/AC
ዝዕቅቦ/AC
ዝዕብልል/AC
ዝዕንቅፍ/AC
ዝዕወት/AC
ዝዕዘብ/AC
ዝዕዘቦ/AC
ዝዕድል/AC
ዝዕጸፍ/AC
ዝዕጾ/AC
ዝዘምት/AC
ዝዘራረበሉ/AC
ዝዘራረብ/AC
ዝዘርኡ/AC
ዝዘርግ/AC
ዝዘውር/AC
ዝዛመድ/AC
ዝዛረበሉ/AC
ዝዛረቡ/AC
ዝዛረባ/AC
ዝዛረብ/AC
ዝዛረብሉ/AC
ዝዛረቦ/AC
ዝዛተ/AC
ዝዛዘም/AC
ዝዛይድ/AC
ዝደለየ/AG
ዝደልዩ/AC
ዝደልይዎ/AC
ዝደልዮም/AC
ዝደክም/AC
ዝደገፉ/AG
ዝደግም/AC
ዝደግሞ/AC
ዝደፍን/AC
ዝደፍኣሉ/AC
ዝደፍእ/AC
ዝዳለወሉ/AC
ዝዳሎ/AC
ዝድህስስ/AC
ዝድለ/AC
ዝድልድል/AC
ዝድሕን/AC
ዝድቅስ/AC
ዝድነቕ/AC
ዝድውል/AC
ዝድይብ/AC
ዝድገፍ/AC
ዝድግፉ/AC
ዝድግፍ/AC
ዝድግፎ/AC
ዝድፋእ/AC
ዝጀመረ/AG
ዝጀመሩ/AG
ዝጀመራ/AG
ዝጅምሩ/AC
ዝገለጸ/AC
ዝገላገል/AC
ዝገልጸሎም/AC
ዝገልጽ/AC
ዝገሹ/AC
ዝገበረ/AG
ዝገበረት/AG
ዝገበሩ/AG
ዝገበሩዋ/AG
ዝገበሮ/AG
ዝገብረ/AC
ዝገብረሎም/AC
ዝገብረና/AC
ዝገብሩ/AC
ዝገብሩዎ/AC
ዝገብራ/AC
ዝገብር/AC
ዝገብርዎ/AC
ዝገብሮ/AC
ዝገብሮም/AC
ዝገዝኡ/AC
ዝገዝእ/AC
ዝገዝኦ/AC
ዝገደፈ/AC
ዝገድፍ/AC
ዝገድፎ/AC
ዝገጥም/AC
ዝገጥሞ/AC
ዝጋገ/AC
ዝግለጽ/AC
ዝግመት/AC
ዝግምት/AC
ዝግምገም/AC
ዝግምግም/AC
ዝግረም/AC
ዝግስግስ/AC
ዝግበረሉ/AC
ዝግበረሎም/AC
ዝግበሩ/AC
ዝግበር/AC
ዝግበኦ/AC
ዝግባእ/AC
ዝግብር/AC
ዝግብሮ/AC
ዝግብኦ/AC
ዝግብኦም/AC
ዝግንዘብ/AC
ዝግንዘቦ/AC
ዝግዛእ/AC
ዝግደሱ/AC
ዝግደስ/AC
ዝግደድ/AC
ዝጎዓዝ/AC
ዝጎዩ/AC
ዝጎደለ/AG
ዝጎድእ/AC
ዝጓዓዝ/AC
ዝጠራጠር/AC
ዝጠቅስ/AC
ዝጠዓሞ/AG
ዝጠፍአ/AC
ዝጠፍኡ/AC
ዝጠፍእ/AC
ዝጣበቕ/AC
ዝጥለም/AC
ዝጥሕል/AC
ዝጥመት/AC
ዝጥምቱ/AC
ዝጥምታ/AC
ዝጥምት/AC
ዝጥምቶ/AC
ዝጥርንፍ/AC
ዝጥቀመሉ/AC
ዝጥቀመላ/AC
ዝጥቀመሎም/AC
ዝጥቀሙ/AC
ዝጥቀሙሉ/AC
ዝጥቀም/AC
ዝጥቀምሉ/AC
ዝጥቃዕ/AC
ዝጥንቀቕ/AC
ዝጥዕም/AC
ዝጭበጥ/AC
ዝጭብጥ/AC
ዝጭብጦ/AC
ዝጭነቕ/AC
ዝጸሉ/AC
ዝጸልእ/AC
ዝጸልዎ/AC
ዝጸሓፍ/AC
ዝጸናሕና/AG
ዝጸንሐ/AG
ዝጸንሐት/AG
ዝጸንሑ/AC
ዝጸንሓካ/AC
ዝጸንሖ/AC
ዝጸንዕ/AC
ዝጸደቐ/AG
ዝጻረር/AC
ዝጻረፍ/AC
ዝጻወር/AC
ዝጻወሮ/AC
ዝጻወቱ/AC
ዝጻወታ/AC
ዝጻወት/AC
ዝጽህዩ/AC
ዝጽሊ/AC
ዝጽሓፍ/AC
ዝጽሕፈሉ/AC
ዝጽሕፉ/AC
ዝጽሕፍ/AC
ዝጽሕፎ/AC
ዝጽበ/AC
ዝጽበዩ/AC
ዝጽበያ/AC
ዝጽበዮ/AC
ዝጽበዮም/AC
ዝጽንበር/AC
ዝጽዋዕ/AC
ዝጽውዕ/AC
ዝጽዕረሉ/AC
ዝጽዕሩ/AC
ዝጽዕር/AC
ዝጽገን/AC
ዝፈላለ/AC
ዝፈላለዩ/AC
ዝፈላሊ/AC
ዝፈልዮ/AC
ዝፈልጠሉ/AC
ዝፈልጡ/AC
ዝፈልጡዎ/AC
ዝፈልጣ/AC
ዝፈልጥ/AC
ዝፈልጥዋ/AC
ዝፈልጥዎ/AC
ዝፈልጦ/AC
ዝፈልጦም/AC
ዝፈሪ/AC
ዝፈርሕ/AC
ዝፈርስ/AC
ዝፈርዩ/AC
ዝፈርድ/AC
ዝፈሸለ/AG
ዝፈሽል/AC
ዝፈተነ/AG
ዝፈቱ/AC
ዝፈትሑ/AC
ዝፈትሕ/AC
ዝፈትሕዎ/AC
ዝፈትሖ/AC
ዝፈትዎ/AC
ዝፈጠራ/AC
ዝፈጥረሉ/AC
ዝፈጥር/AC
ዝፈጸመ/AGE
ዝፈጸሙ/AGE
ዝፋለጡ/ACE
ዝፍለ/AC
ዝፍለጡ/AC
ዝፍለጥ/AC
ዝፍረድ/AC
ዝፍተን/AC
ዝፍታሕ/AC
ዝፍትን/AC
ዝፍትሑ/AC
ዝፍትሽ/AC
ዝፍትኑ/AC
ዝፍቶ/AC
ዝፍኖ/AC
ዝፍወስ/AC
ዝፍጠር/AC
ዝፍጸም/AC
ዝፍጽሙ/AC
ዝፍጽም/AC
ዝፍጽሞ/AC
